Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.784

Bonds of state officers and employees—Fixing amount—Additional bonds—Exemptions—Duties of director.

The director shall:

(1) Fix the amount of bond to be given by each appointive state officer and each employee of the state in all cases where it is not fixed by law;

(2) Require the giving of an additional bond, or a bond in a greater amount than provided by law, in all cases where in his or her judgment the statutory bond is not sufficient in amount to cover the liabilities of the officer or employee;

(3) Exempt subordinate employees from giving bond when in his or her judgment their powers and duties are such as not to require a bond.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 507; 2009 c 549 s 5121; 1975 c 40 s 13. Formerly RCW 43.41.360, 43.19.540.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Intent—2002 c 332: See note following RCW 43.19.760.